lexicon/apertium-krc.Seegmiller-Cyrl.twol
Alphabet
	а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ч ц ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
	А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ч Ц Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я

	a:а â:я e:е i:и     ı:ы o:о ö:ё u:у ü:ю
        A:А Â:Я E:Е İ:И I:И I:Ы O:О Ö:О Ö:Ё U:У Ü:У Ü:Ю

        b:б c:0 ç:ч d:д f:ф g:г ğ:г h:х j:ж k:к l:л m:м n:н ñ:н p:п q:к r:р s:с ş:ш t:т v:в w:в x:х y:й z:з
        B:Б C:0 Ç:Ч D:Д F:Ф G:Г Ğ:Г H:Х J:Ж K:К L:Л M:М N:Н Ñ:Н P:П Q:К R:Р S:С Ş:Ш T:Т V:В W:В X:Х Y:Й Z:З

        %{ъ%}:ъ %{ъ%}:0 %{ь%}:ь ! %{ь%}:0
 
        %{☭%}:0 ! %{Ъ%}:ъ %{Ь%}:ь
        %{щ%}:щ %{ц%}:ц 


;

Sets

Cns = b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n ñ p q r s ş t v w x y z
      B C Ç D F G Ğ H J K L M N Ñ P Q R S Ş T V W X Y Z ;

Vow = a â e i ı ï o ö u ü
      A Â E İ I Ï O Ö U Ü ;

FrontVow = e i ö ü
           E İ Ö Ü ;

FrontRoundVow = ö ü
                Ö Ü ;

FrontUnroundVow = e i
                  E İ ;

BackVow = a â ı ï o u
          A Â I Ï O U ;

CyrBackVowNoYot = а о у
                  А О У ;

CyrYotVowels = е ё ю я
               Е Ё Ю Я ;

CyrYotBackVowels = ё ю
                   Ё Ю ;


Rules

!"Use ь after front vowel realised as back vowel and all front l"
!!%{ь%}:ь <=> FrontVow:CyrBackVowNoYot Cns: ( %{ь%}: Cns: ) _ ;
!%{ь%}:ь => FrontVow:CyrBackVowNoYot Cns: ( %{ь%}: Cns: ) _ ;
!            .#. y: FrontVow:CyrYotBackVowels Cns: _ .#. ;
!            :ъ FrontRoundVow: Cns: _ .#. ;
!            FrontVow: l: _ \Vow: ;
!        except
!            _ FrontVow: ;
!            l: _ l: ; ! telli:телли
!            l: _ â: ; ! külâ:куля
!            [ k: | g: ] _ ;
!            \l: _ Cns: [ Cns: | :ъ | :0 ]* :CyrYotBackVowels ;
!            _ Cns: %{ь%}: .#. ; ! üst:усть

!! üst:усть
!@ 
!! telli:телли

"Use ъ after к and г in the context of back vowels"
%{ъ%}:ъ <=> BackVow: [ k: | g: ] _ ;
            [ k: | g: ] _ BackVow: ;

"Delete й in conversion to yot vowels"
Cx:0 <=> _ :CyrYotVowels ;
     where Cx in ( y Y ) ;

"Yot conversion for back vowels"
Vx:Vy <=> [ y: | Y: ] _ ;
      where Vx in ( o u a ) ! e )
            Vy in ( ё ю я ) ! е )
      matched ;

!! yoq:ёкъ

!! yol:ёл

!! yer:ер

!! yahşı:яхшы

!! şeer:шеэр

!@ ş:ш {ь}:0 e:е e:э r:р {ь}:0

!"Front vowel yot conversion"
!Vx:Vy <=> y: _ Cns: :0* [ :ь | FrontVow: ] ;
!          _ .#. ;
!          .#. y: _ ;
!          [ Cns: - [ y: | k: | g: ] ] _ [ Cns: - [ ç: | y: ] ] ;   ! [ ñ: | n: | r: | l: ] ; ! bütün:бут_ю_н
!          [ Vow: Cns: [ Cns: | :ъ | %{ь%}: ]* ]/:0* k: _ ;
!          _ Cns: [ :ъ | :0 | Cns: ]* FrontUnroundVow: ;                 ! öldürildi:ольд_ю_рильди, sözüni:сёз_ю_ни
!          t: %{ь%}: _ n: ;
!      except
!          .#. [ k: | g: ] ( %{ь%}: ) _ ;
!          \y: _ Cns: [ :ъ | :0 | Cns: ]* FrontRoundVow: ; ! göñül:г_о_нъюль, bütün:б_у_тюн EXCEPT sözüni:с_ё_зюни
!          .#. _ Cns: [ :ъ | :0 | Cns: ]* FrontRoundVow: ; ! öldürildi:_о_льдюрильди
!          .#. _ Cns: :ь ; ! урьмет
!      where Vx in ( ö ü )
!            Vy in ( ё ю )
!      matched ;

! Pattern A
!! bütün:бутюн
!@ b:б {ь}:0 ü:у t:т {ь}:0 ü:ю n:н {ь}:0
!! mümkün:мумкюн
!@ m:м {ь}:0 ü:у m:м {ь}:0 k:к {ь}:0 ü:ю n:н {ь}:0
!! müşkül:мушкюль

! Pattern B
!! sözüni:сёзюни
!! söz:сёз

! Pattern C
!! özüñni:озюнъни
!! özü:озю
!! öldürildi:ольдюрильди
!@ ö:о l:л {ь}:ь d:д {ь}:0 ü:ю r:р {ь}:0 i:и l:л {ь}:ь d:д {ь}:0 i:и
!! öldürilgen:ольдюрильген



!! yüz:юзь
!@ y:0 ü:ю z:з {ь}:ь

!! yön:ёнь

!! göñül:гонъюль

!! üç:учь
!! öz:озь
!! üy:уй
!! kün:кунь

!! büyük:буюк

"e as э"
e:э <=> .#. _ ;
        [ e: | a: | i: | ü: ] _ ;

!"ts → ц the t part"
!t:0 <=> _ :0* s: ;
!
!"ts → ц the s part"
!s:ц <=> t: :0* _ ;


!! keñez:кенъез
!! yüzüni:юзюни
!@ y:0 ü:ю z:з {ь}:0 ü:ю n:н {ь}:0 i:и

!! yağya:ягъя
!! dünyanı:дюньяны
!! yaratqan:яраткъан
!! qıyafetimizge:къыяфетимизге
!! lânet:лянет
!! mahlüqlarğa:махлюкъларгъа
!! ucüm:уджюм
!! punktuatsiya:пунктуация
!! bugünge:бугуньге
!! yeudiyler:еудийлер
!! soyundan:союндан
!! İsrailge:Исраильге
!! onen:онен
!! soñ:сонъ
!! olsun:олсун
!! bu:бу
!! boyunca:боюнджа
!! kök:кок
!! köy:кой

!! ekinci:экинджи
!! özü:озю
!! ürmet:урьмет
!@ ü:у r:р {ь}:ь m:м {ь}:0 e:е t:т {ь}:0
!! ömür:омюр
!! közü:козю
!! köstergen:косьтерген
!! quyunı:къуюны
!! kördim:корьдим
!! qorqqan:къоркъкъан
!! künü:куню
!! İbramğa:Ибрамгъа
!! qoyulğan:къоюлгъан
!! köyüne:коюне
!! oğlan:огълан
!! oña:онъа
!! oğluna:огълуна
!! bugün:бугунь
!! ğurbetlikte:гъурбетликте
!! qasevetini:къасеветини
!! evlâtlarıñ:эвлятларынъ
!! lâkin:лякин
!! ruh:рух

!! telli:телли
!! süngertaş:сюнгерташ
!! özgün:озьгюн

!! Şçolkino:Щёлкино
!! köçip:кочип
